Hawaii statutes.
§88-94 Withholding of income taxes.
Pension, annuity, and retirement allowance payments from the system shall be
subject to income tax withholding requirements as set forth by the federal
government; payment of these taxes as withheld shall be the liability of the
system. The board of trustees shall adopt rules to administer the purposes of
this section. [L 1966, c 11, §§2, 3; HRS §88-85; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1;
gen ch 1985; am L 2005, c 58, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next